Utah, session 2026, SB53.
Section 1. Section 63L-9-104 is amended to read:63L-9-104. Public Land Management Advisory Board. (1)There is created the Public Land Management Advisory Board.(2)The board consists of the following 1113 members:(a)the lieutenant governor, or the lieutenant governor's designee;(b)the state historic preservation officer, created in Section 9-8a-202, or the state historic preservation officer's designee;(c)the director of the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration, created in Section 53C-1-201, or the director's designee;(b)(d)one representative, appointed by the governor, who represents the interests of oil, gas, and mining;(c)(e)one representative, appointed by the governor, who represents the interests of agriculture;(d)(f)one representative, appointed by the governor, who represents the interests of outdoor recreation;(e)(g)one representative, appointed by the governor, who represents the interests of environmental groups;(f)(h)three representatives, appointed by the governor, who represent the interests of county commissioners;(g)(i)one representative, appointed by the governor, who represents the interests of rural transportation;(h)(j)one representative, appointed by the governor, who represents the interests of wildlife management; and(i)(k)one representative, appointed by the governor, who represents the interests of forest management.(3)(a)Members shall beare appointed for a term of four years.(b)Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms of the members described in Subsections (2)(b)(2)(d) through (i)(k) to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that half of the appointed board is appointed every two years.(4)A member may serve more than one term.(5)A member shall hold office until the expiration of the member's term and until the member's successor is appointed, but not more than 90 days after the expiration of the member's term.(6)When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the governor shall appoint a replacement shall be appointed for the remainder of the unexpired term.(7)The board shall elect annually a chair and a vice chair from the board's members.(8)(a)The board shall meet at least quarterly.(b)Special meetings may be called by the chair upon: (i)the chair's own initiative, upon ;(ii)the request of the director, or upon; or (iii)the request of at least three members of the board.(c)Three days' notice shall be given to The chair shall notify each member of the board at least three days before a meeting.(9)SixSeven members constitute a quorum at a meeting, and the action of a majority of members present is the action of the board.(10)A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:(a)Section 63A-3-106;(b)Section 63A-3-107; and(c)rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.